California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The schedules shall plainly state the places between which property and persons will be carried, and the classification of passengers or property in force, and shall state separately all terminal charges, storage charges, icing charges, and all other charges which the commission may require to be stated, all privileges or facilities granted or allowed, and all rules which may in any wise change, affect, or determine any part, or the aggregate of, such rates, fares, charges, and classifications, or the value of the service rendered to the passenger, shipper, or consignee. Schedules shall be plainly printed, and copies thereof shall be kept by every such carrier at such stations or offices of the carrier and subject to such conditions as the commission may determine and prescribe by order or rule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2121.)
-------------------------------------------

488.

(a) Subject to such rules as the commission may prescribe, the schedules of carriers shall be produced and made available for inspection upon the demand of any person. The form of every such schedule shall be prescribed by the commission and shall conform, in the case of any common carrier subject to federal regulation as nearly as possible to the form of schedules prescribed by the federal Surface Transportation Board.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

489.

(a) The commission shall, by rule or order, require every public utility other than a common carrier to file with the commission within the time and in the form as the commission designates, and to print and keep open to public inspection, schedules showing all rates, tolls, rentals, charges, and classifications collected or enforced, or to be collected or enforced, together with all rules, contracts, privileges, and facilities which in any manner affect or relate to rates, tolls, rentals, classifications, or service. Nothing in this section shall prevent the commission from approving or fixing rates, tolls, rentals, or charges, from time to time, in excess of or less than those shown by the schedules.

(b) The commission shall, by rule or order, require every telephone corporation operating within a service area, on first contact by a prospective subscriber and in subsequent contacts by the subscriber for the purpose of changing service, to fully inform the subscriber of the basic services available to the class of subscribers to which the subscriber belongs. For eligible residential subscribers, these services shall include universal lifeline telephone service. The subscriber shall be presented with information orally, in print form, or in computer data form, according to the means by which contact is established. If after a hearing, the commission finds that any telephone corporation has not provided prospective subscribers with the information required by this section, the commission may make an appropriate adjustment of the telephone corporation’s rates or impose penalties pursuant to other provisions of law.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 980, Sec. 2) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 809, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

490.

(a) The commission may from time to time determine and prescribe by order changes in the form of the schedules referred to in this article as it finds expedient, and may modify the requirements of any of its orders or rules in respect to any matter referred to in this article.

(b) If the rates for any commercial mobile radio service are not subject to regulation by the commission as a result of federal law, then the commission may exempt the service from any tariff-filing requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

491.

Unless the commission otherwise orders, no change shall be made by any public utility in any rate or classification, or in any rule or contract relating to or affecting any rate, classification, or service, or in any privilege or facility, except after 30 days’ notice to the commission and to the public. Notice shall be given by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection new schedules stating plainly the changes to be made in the schedule or schedules then in force, and the time when the changes will go into effect. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes without requiring the 30 days’ notice, by an order specifying the changes that may be made on less than 30 days’ notice, the time when they shall take effect, and the manner in which they shall be filed and published. When any change is proposed in any rate or classification, or in any form of contract or agreement or in any rule or contract relating to or affecting any rate, classification, or service, or in any privilege or facility, attention shall be directed to such change on the schedule filed with the commission, by some character to be designated by the commission, immediately preceding or following the item.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

491.1.

Notwithstanding Section 491, the commission may authorize a passenger stage corporation, upon one day’s notice, to reduce its rates and charges to not less than those of a competing passenger transportation service operating over substantially the same route pursuant to federal operating authority. The commission may attach any conditions it finds reasonable or necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 142, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

492.

The names of the several public utilities which are parties to any joint tariff, rate, contract, or classification shall be specified in the schedule. Unless otherwise ordered by the commission, a schedule showing such joint tariff, rate, contract, or classification need be filed with the commission by only one of the parties to it, if there is also filed with the commission, in such form as it may require, a concurrence therein by each of the other parties thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

493.

(a) No common carrier subject to this part shall engage or participate in the transportation of persons or property, between points within this state, until its schedules of rates, fares, charges, and classifications have been filed and published in accordance with this part.

(b) If any common carrier of property, in contravention of subdivision (a), transports any property for which it does not have schedules of rates, fares, charges, and classifications on file, the commission may establish a just and reasonable charge for the transportation.

(c) This section is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

494.

(a) No common carrier shall charge, demand, collect, or receive a different compensation for the transportation of persons or property, or for any service in connection therewith, than the applicable rates, fares, and charges specified in its schedules filed and in effect at the time, nor shall any such carrier refund or remit in any manner or by any device any portion of the rates, fares, or charges so specified, except upon order of the commission as provided in this part, nor extend to any corporation or person any privilege or facility in the transportation of passengers or property except such as are regularly and uniformly extended to all corporations and persons.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

495.

Every telegraph and telephone corporation shall print and file with the commission schedules showing all the rates and classifications for the transmission of messages or conversations between all of the following points, unless otherwise exempted, in whole or in part, from the filing requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 489:

(a) Between all points within this state and all points outside the state upon its route.

(b) Between all points within this state and all points outside the state upon every route leased, operated, or controlled by it.

(c) Between all points on its route or upon any route, leased, operated, or controlled by it within this state and all points outside the state upon the route of any other telegraph or telephone corporation, whenever a through route and joint rate have been established between any two of these points.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 980, Sec. 3) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 809, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

495.6.

(a) Any city, county, or city and county that levies a utility user tax on the consumption of telephone services, including, but not limited to, the tax authorized by Section 7284.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall provide to the commission the rate of the tax, the manner in which the tax is collected, and the frequency with which the tax is collected.

(b) The commission shall establish the periodic frequency at which information required by subdivision (a) shall be submitted to the commission.

(c) The commission shall provide information received pursuant to subdivision (a) to any person or entity upon receiving a request for the information. The commission may charge a fee, at a level that shall not exceed the direct expenses of the commission in preparing and providing the information, to any person or entity that receives the information.

(d) The commission shall not be responsible for the accuracy of the information that it receives from a city, county, or city and county and provides pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

495.7.

(a) The commission may, by rule or order, establish procedures to allow telephone or telegraph corporations to apply for the exemption of certain telecommunications services from the tariffing requirements of Sections 454, 489, 491, and 495.

(b) The commission may, by rule or order, partially or completely exempt certain telecommunications services, except basic exchange service offered by telephone or telegraph corporations, from the tariffing requirements of Sections 454, 489, 491, and 495 if either of the following conditions is met:

(1) The commission finds that the telephone corporation lacks significant market power in the market for that service for which an exemption from Sections 454, 489, 491, and 495 is being requested. Criteria to determine market power shall include, but not be limited to, the following: company size, market share, and type of service for which an exemption is being requested. The commission shall promulgate rules for determining market power based on these and other appropriate criteria.

(2) The Commission finds that a telephone corporation is offering a service in a given market for which competitive alternatives are available to most consumers, and the commission has determined that sufficient consumer protections exist in the form of rules and enforcement mechanisms to minimize the risk to consumers and competition from unfair competition or anticompetitive behavior in the market for the competitive telecommunications service for which a provider is requesting an exemption from Sections 454, 489, 491, and 495. This paragraph does not apply to monopoly services for which the commission retains exclusive authority to set or change rates.

(c) Before implementing procedures to allow telephone corporations to apply for the exemption of certain telecommunications services from the tariffing requirements of Sections 454, 489, 491, and 495, and no later than September 30, 1996, the commission shall establish consumer protection rules for those exempted services that include, but are not limited to:

(1) Rules regarding the availability of rates, terms, and conditions of service to consumers.

(2) Rules regarding notices to consumers of rate increases and decreases, changes in terms and conditions of service, and change of ownership.

(3) Rules to identify and eliminate unacceptable marketing practices including, but not limited to, fraudulent marketing practices.

(4) Rules to assure that aggrieved consumers have speedy, low-cost, and effective avenues available to seek relief in a reasonable time.

(5) Rules to assure consumers that their right to informational privacy for services over which the commission has oversight.

(6) Rules to assure a telephone corporation’s cooperation with the commission investigations of customer complaints.

(d) Prior to granting every exemption from the tariffing requirements of Sections 454, 489, 491, and 495, the commission shall find that there is no improper cross-subsidization or anticompetitive behavior in connection with the service for which an exemption is requested.

(e) Nothing in this section shall require that the commission exempt any telecommunications service or telecommunications service provider from the requirements of Sections 454, 489, 491, and 495, nor shall this section limit the authority of the commission to require telephone corporations to provide it with contemporaneous information about the current terms, conditions, and prices under which telecommunications services that are exempted, in whole or in part, from Sections 454, 489, 491, and 495 are being offered to subscribers.

(f) The commission, after notice and hearing if requested, may cancel, revoke, or suspend any exemption granted under subdivision (b) to any telephone corporation that fails to comply with any of the rules established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (c).

(g) Any telecommunications service exempted from the tariffing requirements of Sections 454, 489, 491, and 495 shall not be subject to the limitation on damages that applies to tariffed telecommunications services.

(h) The provisions of this section do not apply to commercial mobile services as defined by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993 (Public Law 103-66).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 197.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Free or Reduced Rates [521. - 533.]

521.

As used in this article “employees” includes furloughed, pensioned, and superannuated employees of any common carrier subject to the provisions of this part, persons who have become disabled or infirm in the service of any such carrier, ex-employees traveling for the purpose of entering the service of any such carrier, and the remains of persons dying while in the employment of any such carrier; and “families” includes the families of such persons and the families of persons killed, and the surviving spouses until remarried and minor children during minority of persons who died while in the service of any such carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

522.

Except as provided in this article, Sections 40180.5 and 99151 of this code, and Section 26002.5 of the Government Code, no common carrier subject to the provisions of this part shall, directly or indirectly, issue, give, or tender any free ticket, free pass, or free or reduced rate transportation for passengers between points within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

523.

When approved by the commission, a common carrier may give free or reduced rate transportation between points within this state to:

(a) Its officers, agents, employees, and members of their families.

(b) Indigent, destitute, and homeless persons, and to such persons when transported by charitable societies or hospitals, and the necessary agents employed in such transportation.

(c) Persons injured in accidents or wrecks, and physicians and nurses attending such persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 467, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

524.

(a) Any common carrier may issue free or reduced rate passenger transportation to the proprietors and employees of newspapers and magazines and the members of their immediate families in exchange for advertising of equal or greater value in that media, subject to reasonable restrictions that the commission may impose.

(b) The San Francisco-San Jose commute rail service may issue free or reduced rate passenger transportation to the proprietors and employees of the broadcast news media in exchange for advertising of equal or greater value in those media, subject to reasonable restrictions that the commission may impose. On or before January 1, 1989, the Department of Transportation shall review and assess the effectiveness and cost of any advertising program effectuated through exchanges made pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) Passenger stage corporations may issue free or reduced rate passenger transportation to any of their commission agents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1406, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

525.

All blind residents of California may be granted free transportation on all street cars and may be permitted to travel on all other common carriers within the State for one-half the current fare, and when any blind person is accompanied by a guide, the combined fares for such blind person and his guide may be fixed at not to exceed the current fare for an individual.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

527.

Nothing in this part shall prevent the interchange of free or reduced rate transportation for passenger or express matter between common carriers, their officers, agents, employees, attorneys, physicians and surgeons, and members of their families, where such common carriers are subject in whole or in part to the jurisdiction of the commission or of the federal Surface Transportation Board or where such common carriers, though not in whole or in part subject to the jurisdiction of this commission or of the federal Surface Transportation Board are engaged in the business of transporting passengers and freight by water between the United States and foreign countries, and are permitted by federal law to interchange such free transportation with common carriers which are subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission or the federal Surface Transportation Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

528.

Nothing in this part shall prevent the interchange of free or reduced rate transportation for passengers or express matter between a common carrier and a corporation engaged in the carriage of persons or property by motor vehicle, or the officers, agents, employees, attorneys, physicians and surgeons of such common carrier or corporation and their families when the corporation is engaged in the carriage by motor vehicle of persons or property as a connecting carrier, or in the carriage by motor vehicle of persons or property over a portion of a route between the point of departure or shipment and arrival or delivery, part of which route is covered or traveled by a common carrier, whether the carriage by motor vehicle is an initial, an intermediate, or a final portion of the entire route between the point of departure or shipment and arrival or delivery.

This section does not authorize the interchange of free or reduced rate transportation for express matter which is not for the personal use of the person to or for whom it is granted, or of his family.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

529.

Nothing in this part shall prevent any of the following:

(a) The issue of reduced rate transportation by a common carrier to children attending an institution of learning.

(b) The issue of passes or franks by telegraph or telephone corporations to their officers, agents, employees, attorneys, physicians and surgeons, and members of their families, or the exchange of passes or franks between the telegraph and telephone corporations or between the corporations and the common carriers, for their officers, agents, employees, attorneys, physicians and surgeons, and members of their families.

(c) The carrying out of contracts for free or reduced rate passenger transportation previously made, founded upon adequate consideration and lawful when made. 

(d) A common carrier from transporting, storing, or handling, free or at reduced rates, the household goods and personal effects of its employees, of persons entering or leaving its service, and of persons killed or dying while in its service.

(e) A common carrier from providing reduced rate transportation to elderly and handicapped persons when required pursuant to an application for federal funds under the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964 (49 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

530.

(a) Every common carrier subject to the provisions of this part may transport, free or at reduced rates, as follows:

(1) Persons for the United States, state, county, or municipal governments, or persons or property for charitable or patriotic purposes, or to provide relief in cases of general epidemic, pestilence, or calamity.

(2) Contractors and their employees, material or supplies for use or engaged in carrying out their contracts with such carriers, for construction, operation, or maintenance work or work incidental thereto on the line of the issuing carrier, to the extent only that such free or reduced rate transportation is provided for in the specifications upon which the contract is based and in the contract itself.

(b) Common carriers may also enter into contracts with telegraph and telephone corporations for an exchange of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

531.

Every common carrier subject to the provisions of this part may transport free or at reduced rates contractors and their employees engaged in carrying out contracts with the United States, this State, or any county or municipal government, or other governmental agency in this State, and materials or supplies for use in carrying out such contracts, in each case to the extent only that such free or reduced rate transportation is provided for in the specifications upon which the contract is based and in the contract itself.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

532.

Except as in this article otherwise provided, no public utility shall charge, or receive a different compensation for any product or commodity furnished or to be furnished, or for any service rendered or to be rendered, than the rates, tolls, rentals, and charges applicable thereto as specified in its schedules on file and in effect at the time, nor shall any public utility engaged in furnishing or rendering more than one product, commodity, or service, charge, demand, collect, or receive a different compensation for the collective, combined, or contemporaneous furnishing or rendition of two or more of such products, commodities, or services, than the aggregate of the rates, tolls, rentals, or charges specified in its schedules on file and in effect at the time, applicable to each such product, commodity, or service when separately furnished or rendered, nor shall any such public utility refund or remit, directly or indirectly, in any manner or by any device, any portion of the rates, tolls, rentals, and charges so specified, nor extend to any corporation or person any form of contract or agreement or any rule or regulation or any facility or privilege except such as are regularly and uniformly extended to all corporations and persons. The commission may by rule or order establish such exceptions from the operation of this prohibition as it may consider just and reasonable as to each public utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

533.

The officers and employees of the Operations and Safety Section of the Transportation Division of the commission, shall, when in the performance of their official duties, have the right to pass, free of charge, on all railroads, cars, vessels, and other vehicles of every common carrier subject to control or regulation by the commission, between points within this State, whether such railroad, car, vessel, or other vehicle is used for the transportation of passengers or freight, and regardless of its class. Such officers and employees when in the performance of their official duties shall have free access to any portion of any train, including the engine or any other units of rolling stock, and to all portions of any vessel or other vehicle of any common carrier used for the transportation of passengers or freight.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1033.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Facilities [556. - 564.]

556.

Every common carrier shall afford all reasonable, proper, and equal facilities for the prompt and efficient interchange and transfer of passengers between the lines owned, operated, controlled, or leased by it and the lines of every other common carrier, and shall make such interchange and transfer promptly without discrimination between passengers or carriers as to compensation charged, service rendered, or facilities afforded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

558.

Every telephone corporation and telegraph corporation operating in this State shall receive, transmit, and deliver, without discrimination or delay, the conversations and messages of every other such corporation with whose line a physical connection has been made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

559.

(a) Nothing in Sections 556 to 558, inclusive, shall limit or modify the duty of a common carrier to establish joint rates, fares, and charges for the transportation of passengers and property over the lines owned, operated, controlled, or leased by it and the lines of other common carriers, or the power of the commission to require the establishment of such joint rates, fares, and charges.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

560.

Upon the application of any shipper or receiver or contemplated shipper or receiver of freight for a connection between the railroad of a railroad corporation and its existing or contemplated private track or railroad, the railroad corporation shall make the connection, provide such switches and tracks as may be necessary for that purpose, and deliver and receive cars thereover, if the connection is reasonably practicable and can be installed and used without materially increasing the hazard of the operation of the railroad with which the connection is sought, and if the business which may reasonably be expected to be received by the railroad corporation over the connection is sufficient to justify the expense of the connection to the railroad corporation.

Upon the same conditions, every railroad corporation, upon the application of any shipper or receiver or contemplated shipper or receiver of freight, shall construct upon its right of way a spur or spurs for the purpose of receiving and delivering freight thereby, and shall receive and deliver freight thereby.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

561.

(a) Every railroad corporation, passenger stage corporation, passenger air carrier, and street railroad corporation providing departures originating in this state shall prohibit the smoking of a tobacco product in the passenger seating area of every passenger car, passenger stage, aircraft, or other vehicle.

(b) Every such corporation and carrier shall display in the passenger seating area of every passenger car, passenger stage, aircraft, or other vehicle, notices sufficient in number, posted in such locations as to be readily seen by boarding passengers, advising passengers of the no smoking requirements pursuant to subdivision (a). Words on such notices which state “No Smoking” or
 an equivalent phrase shall be at least three-quarters of one inch high, and any other explanatory words on the notices shall be at least one-quarter of one inch high.

(c) No person shall smoke a tobacco product in a space known by him or her to be designated for nonsmoking passengers. A violation of this subdivision is not a crime.

(d) As used in this section, “passenger air carrier” shall have the same meaning as provided in Sections 2741 and 2743.

(e) For purposes of this section, “smoke” and “smoking” have the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “tobacco product” means a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and
 Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 25.   (SB 5 2x)   Effective June 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

562.

(a) Whenever the commission, on its own motion or upon the complaint of a public utility, finds that public convenience and necessity require the use by a public utility of all, or any part, of the passenger vessel terminal facilities operated or controlled by the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, and the district and the public utility are unable to agree upon the use or the terms and conditions or compensation therefor, the commission shall by order direct that the use by the public utility be permitted, and prescribe a reasonable compensation and reasonable terms and conditions to be charged and observed, including, but not limited to, all related costs of construction, capital improvement, leasing or rental, and maintenance.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 27280 of the Streets and Highways Code or any other provision of law, and for purposes of this section only, the passenger vessel service of the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District is subject to the jurisdiction of the commission and the provisions of this part. The commission shall have no jurisdiction over the operation of passenger vessels by the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District or any other operation of the district except as specifically provided in this section.

(c) The commission shall require that any public utility which provides passenger-ferry or other transportation service for the district first obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity authorizing such operations.

(d) Any public utility which initiates any complaint pursuant to this section shall reimburse the commission for its reasonable expenses in hearing and determining the complaint.

(e) The commission may establish such rules as it determines necessary to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 717, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

564.

By January 1, 2024, the commission shall update General Order 131-D to authorize each public utility electrical corporation to use the permit-to-construct process or claim an exemption under Section III(B) of that general order to seek approval to construct an extension, expansion, upgrade, or other modification to its existing electrical transmission facilities, including electric transmission lines and substations within existing transmission
 easements, rights of way, or franchise agreements, irrespective of whether the electrical transmission facility is above a 200-kilovolt voltage level.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 357, Sec. 1.   (SB 529)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reports to the Commission [581. - 591.]

581.

Every public utility shall furnish to the commission in such form and detail as the commission prescribes all tabulations, computations, and all other information required by it to carry into effect any of the provisions of this part, and shall make specific answers to all questions submitted by the commission.

Every public utility receiving from the commission any blanks with directions to fill them shall answer fully and correctly each question propounded therein, and if it is unable to answer any question, it shall give a good and sufficient reason for such failure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

582.

Whenever required by the commission, every public utility shall deliver to the commission copies of any or all maps, profiles, contracts, agreements, franchises, reports, books, accounts, papers, and records in its possession or in any way relating to its property or affecting its business, and also a complete inventory of all its property in such form as the commission may direct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

583.

(a) No information furnished to the commission by a public utility, a business that is a subsidiary or affiliate of a public utility, or a corporation that holds a controlling interest in a public utility, except those matters specifically required to be open to public inspection by this part, shall be open to public inspection or made public, except on order of the commission or by the commission or a commissioner in the course of a hearing or proceeding. A present or former officer or employee of the commission who divulges that information is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law, a present officer or employee of the commission may share information with the Independent System Operator
 pursuant to an agreement to treat the shared information as confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 361, Sec. 6.   (SB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

584.

Every public utility shall furnish such reports to the commission at such time and in such form as the commission may require in which the utility shall specifically answer all questions propounded by the commission. The commission may require any public utility to file monthly reports of earnings and expenses, and to file periodical or special reports, or both, concerning any matter about which the commission is authorized by any law to inquire or to keep itself informed, or which it is required to enforce. All reports shall be under oath when required by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 278.)
-------------------------------------------

585.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), every public utility and business specified in subdivision (b) shall in any rate proceeding or proceeding establishing a fact or rule that may influence a rate, provide the commission with access to all computer models, as defined in Section 1821, which are used by that public utility or business to substantiate their showing in the proceeding.

(b) The commission shall, by rule or order, with full opportunity for participation by utilities and other affected parties, establish procedures and safeguards governing its access to, and monitoring, verification, and use of, computer models of every public utility and of any business which is a commission regulated subsidiary or affiliate of a public utility with respect to any rate proceeding or proceeding establishing a fact or rule that may influence a rate. The time, place, and manner of commission access shall, to the extent practicable, be the subject of mutual agreement between the commission and the affected utility, and the parties shall make every good faith effort to reach agreement. If an agreement is reached, it shall include, but is not limited to, provisions to reasonably assure the legitimate needs for security of the public utilities’ computer resources. These provisions shall provide for the confidentiality of records, the protection of proprietary information, and the protection of the reasonable expectation of customers of public utilities in the privacy of customer-specific records maintained by the utility. If no agreement is reached, any order issued by the commission requiring computer access shall include, but is not limited to, provisions providing for the security of the utility’s data bases, confidentiality of records, protection of proprietary information, and the privacy of customer-specific records maintained by the utility. The commission shall convene a proceeding to adopt these rules as soon as possible after the operative date of the act adding this section to the code.

(c) This section shall not expand or limit any powers of the commission to prescribe the manner of keeping books, records, and systems of accounts of public utilities and to investigate any of these books, records, systems of accounts, or memoranda under existing law, or any other power of the commission under existing law. Any utility may object to a rule or order of the commission concerning the access prescribed herein under the rules of procedure of the commission consistent with existing law.

(d) This section does not apply to common carriers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1297, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

587.

Every water corporation with more than 2,000 service connections, and every electrical, gas, and telephone corporation shall annually prepare and submit to the commission a report describing all significant transactions, as specified by the commission, between the corporation and every subsidiary or affiliate of, or corporation holding a controlling interest in, the water, electrical, gas, or telephone corporation. The report shall identify the nature of the transactions and the terms and conditions applying to them, including, but not limited to, the basis upon which cost allocations and transfer pricing were established for the transactions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 224, Sec. 3.   (SB 1364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

588.

(a) Notwithstanding any regulation, tariff, opinion, or interim opinion of the Public Utilities Commission, or any other provision of law, an inspector or investigator, as defined in Section 830.1 of the Penal Code, who is employed in the office of a district attorney may request and shall receive from telephone, gas, and electric public utilities customer information limited to the full name, date of birth, social security number, address, prior address, forwarding address, place of employment, and date of service instituted, terminated, or suspended by, utility customers to the extent the information is stored within the utility records and computer data bases. However, in no case shall information be released disclosing customer usage of the services provided by the utility without a court order or subpoena.

(b) In order to protect the privacy interest of utility customers, a request to a public utility for customer information pursuant to this section shall meet the following requirements:
